Idaho, session 2025, H0243.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-1101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1101. POLICY. It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state
to establish a minimum statewide system for the protection of children in
daycare facilities. This system is intended to establish minimum standards,
while still leaving primary responsibility for evaluation and selection of
daycare services with parents. The minimum standards established by this
chapter shall not be construed as preempting more stringent regulation by
county or city ordinance.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-1102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the Idaho board of health and welfare.
(2) "Child" means a person less than thirteen (13) years of age.
(3) "Daycare" means care and supervision provided for compensation
during part of a twenty-four (24) hour day, for a child or children not
related by blood, marriage or legal guardianship to the person or persons
providing the care, in a place other than the child's or children's own home
or homes.
(4) "Daycare center" means a place or facility providing daycare for
compensation for thirteen (13) or more children.


(5) "Daycare facility" means a place or facility providing daycare
services for compensation to seven (7) or more children not related to the
provider.
(6) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(7) "Employee" means any person working for compensation in a facility
that provides daycare.
(8) "Family daycare home" means a home, place, or facility providing
daycare for six (6) or fewer children.
(9) "Group daycare facility" means a home, place, or facility providing
daycare for seven (7) to twelve (12) children.
(10) "Group size" means the maximum number of children in one (1) group
or classroom.
(11) "Mixed age group" means a care group that includes children of mul-
tiple ages.
(12) "Ratio" means the number of staff required to supervise a certain
number of children.
(13) "Single age group" means a care group that includes children of
similar age.
(14) "Supervision" means:
(a) For a child less than five (5) years of age, a provider is within
sight or normal hearing range of the child and near enough to render im-
mediate assistance to the child;
(b) For a child five (5) years of age and older, a provider is within
sight or normal hearing range of the child as appropriate to the child's
individual age, needs, and capabilities; and
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, for all children
while sleeping, swimming or engaging in other water activity involving
a pool, hot tub, or other body of water, or on field trips or activities
away from the facility, a provider is within sight and normal hearing
range of the child.
(14) (15) "Training" means continuing education in child development
areas relating to child care. Training can be acquired through a variety of
methods including, but not limited to, the viewing of audio visual materi-
als, correspondence courses, community workshops and in-house training.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-1104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1104. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE -- FIRE SAFETY AND HEALTH INSPEC-
TIONS. (1) Application. A person who wishes to operate a daycare facility
shall be a minimum of eighteen (18) years of age, shall submit an application
on the forms provided by the department, and shall obtain the required cer-
tificates of inspection as provided herein.
(2) Inspections. A person who wishes to operate a daycare facility
shall submit: (a) a certificate of a fire inspection of the proposed center,
conducted by a fire department or fire district official, establishing com-
pliance with the minimum standards specified in section 39-1109, Idaho Code;
and (b) a health and safety inspection of the proposed facility conducted by
a qualified inspector as designated by the department, establishing compli-
ance with the minimum standards specified in sections 39-1109 and 39-1110,
Idaho Code.


(3) Continued compliance and reinspection. Daycare facilities shall
at all times maintain compliance with the safety and health requirements
identified in this chapter. The department may cause any daycare facility to
be reinspected during the term of a license for safety and health compliance
as determined necessary by the department. No charge for any reinspection
after the initial inspection in any license period shall be made to the day-
care facility.
(4) If an applicant fails to complete the application process within
six (6) months, the application will be considered abandoned and shall be
terminated. An applicant whose application is abandoned, and subsequently
terminated, may start a new application at any time.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-1106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1106. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE -- RENEWAL. (1) Upon receipt of the
completed application, inspection certificates and the criminal his-
tory, the department shall, upon a finding of compliance with the minimum
standards set forth in this chapter, issue a basic daycare license to the ap-
plicant. The license shall be valid for two (2) years, unless revoked or sus-
pended, and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the daycare facility.
(2) The department shall send a renewal application to the owner of the
daycare facility no later than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of
an existing license. The owner shall submit to the department the renewal
application with the required renewal fee and a criminal history check prior
to the expiration of the existing license. A complete criminal history check
shall be provided for any new persons requiring a criminal history check in
accordance with section 39-1105, Idaho Code.
(3) Criminal history checks on those persons under eighteen (18) years
of age shall include a check of the juvenile justice records of adjudications
of the magistrate division of the district court, county probation services
and department records as authorized by the minor and his parent or guardian.
(4) The department shall maintain a list of all licensees for public
use.
(5) Submission of a renewal application, fee and required criminal
history check shall entitle the daycare facility owner to continue daycare
services, subject to action by the department pursuant to section 39-1113,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-1108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-1109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1109. SAFETY STANDARDS. (1) Daycare facilities, owners and opera-
tors shall comply with the following safety standards in the area of the day-
care facility in which daycare is provided:
(a) Adequate fire and smoke alarms;
(b) A functional telephone located on the daycare premises during the
hours of operation;


(c) Adequate fire extinguishers;
(d) Adequate exits;
(e) Firearms or other weapons which are stored on the premises of a day-
care facility must be kept in a locked container that is inaccessible to
children while daycare attendees are present;
(f) Pools, hot tubs, ponds and other bodies of water that are on the day-
care facility premises must provide the following safeguards:
(i) The area surrounding the body of water must be fenced and
locked in a manner that prevents access by children and meets the
following requirements:
1. The fence must be at least four (4) feet high with no ver-
tical opening more than four (4) inches wide, be designed so
that a young child cannot climb or squeeze under or through
the fence, surround all sides of the pool and have a gate that
is self-closing and that has a self-latching mechanism in
proper working order out of the reach of young children;
2. If the house forms one (1) side of the barrier for the
pool, all doors that provide unrestricted access to the pool
must have alarms that produce an audible sound when the door
is opened;
3. Furniture or other large objects must not be left near the
fence in a manner that would enable a child to climb on the
furniture or other large object and gain access to the pool;
and
(ii) If the area surrounding a pool, hot tub, pond or other body of
water is not fenced and locked, there must be a secured protective
covering that will not allow access by a child;
(iii) Wading pools must be empty when not in use;
(iv) Children must be under direct supervision of at least one (1)
adult employee while using a pool, hot tub, pond or other body of
water; and
(v) A minimum of a four (4) foot high fence must be present that
prevents access from the daycare facility premises if the daycare
premises are adjacent to a body of water; and
(g) The owner or operator of a daycare facility shall ensure that at
all times when a child or children are present, at least one (1) adult
employee on the premises has current certification in pediatric rescue
breathing and first-aid treatment from a certified instructor.
(2) No fire standards developed pursuant to this chapter shall be more
stringent than the standards contained in the International Fire Code, as
adopted by Idaho.
(3) At least one (1) adult employee must be present at all times when a
child or children are in attendance.
(4)(a) The maximum allowable child:staff ratio shall be a maximum of
twelve (12) points per staff member using the following point system:
(i) Each child in attendance under the age of twenty-four (24)
months shall equal two (2) points.
(ii) Each child in attendance from twenty-four (24) months to un-
der thirty-six (36) months of age shall equal one and one-half (1
1/2) one and thirty-three hundredths (1.33) points.


(iii) Each child in attendance from thirty-six (36) months to un-
der five (5) years of age shall equal one (1) point nine hundred
twenty-three thousandths (0.923) of a point.
(iv) Each child in attendance from five (5) years to under thirteen
(13) years of age shall equal one-half (1/2) point forty-eight
hundredths (0.48) of a point.
(b) Each child in attendance shall be counted by the department for pur-
poses of calculating maximum allowable points, counting the number of
children in attendance and for determining compliance with child:staff
ratios.
(c) Daycare facilities may operate with child:staff ratios more strin-
gent than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-1111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1111. RULES AUTHORIZED. In order to implement the provisions of
this chapter, the department, in addition to other duties imposed by law, is
hereby authorized and directed through rulemaking to establish procedures
necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter including procedure
for submission of required certificates as provided in sections 39-1109
and 39-1110, Idaho Code, and to conduct the criminal history check provided
in section 39-1105, Idaho Code. The rulemaking authority granted in this
section shall be limited to the specific standards and procedures required
by this chapter. The department shall seek to move all necessary rules into
this chapter by July 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. That Section 39-1112A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1112A. ACCESS TO INFORMATION. The department shall make available
to daycare consumers an informational pamphlet, created by the department,
information to educate daycare consumers with informational tools useful in
identifying quality daycare. The department may deliver pamphlets during
direct contact with daycare consumers, or by delivering pamphlets to day-
care providers during the licensing or renewal process, during inspections
or through other appropriate means. The pamphlet shall include, including:
(1) The importance of parents being vigilant for the safety, emotional
health and training of their children that cannot be replaced by any other
institution or individual;
(2) The basic characteristics of a quality daycare;
(3) A strong suggestion to parents to inquire about criminal history
checks for any provider in a family daycare home;
(4) A link to a department approved website that contains more detailed
information; and
(5) A department or other phone number for parents to report unsafe,
dangerous or harmful activities within the daycare.
SECTION 9. That Section 39-1115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


39-1115. MISDEMEANOR. (1) It shall be a misdemeanor to operate a day-
care facility within this state without first obtaining a basic daycare li-
cense from the department or to operate a daycare facility without posting a
basic daycare license in a conspicuous place. A copy of this chapter shall
be available on the premises at all times for staff and parents to read on re-
quest unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.
(2) If a daycare facility is found to be operating without a license,
the licensing agency may grant a grace period of no more than sixty (60) days
to allow the daycare facility to come into compliance with the provisions of
this chapter.
(3) It shall be a misdemeanor to operate a family daycare home caring
for four (4) or more children without obtaining and passing the criminal his-
tory check required in section 39-1105, Idaho Code; provided, that in the
event of an initial citation for violation of the provisions of this subsec-
tion, if a person makes the applications required within twenty (20) days,
the complaint shall be dismissed. Operation of a family daycare home caring
for four (4) or more children after failure to pass a required criminal his-
tory check shall be a misdemeanor.
(4) It is a misdemeanor for any person to provide daycare services
if such person has been found guilty in this state's courts, in any other
state's courts, or in any federal court, of any offense listed under the pro-
visions of section 39-1113, Idaho Code.
SECTION 10. That Section 39-1117, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 39-1120, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.06.03, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Daycare Licensing, Section 011.08. and Sec-
tion 100.06., shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.